Utah statutes.
78B-1-135.   Witnesses -- Proceedings in aid of or supplemental to attachment, garnishment, or execution.

(1)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 78B-1-134, a party or a witness examined in proceedings in aid of or supplemental to attachment, garnishment, or execution is not excused from answering a question on the ground that;

(a)  the answer will tend to convict the party or witness of the commission of a fraud;

(b)  the answer will prove the party or witness has been a party or privy to, or has knowledge of, a conveyance, assignment, transfer or other disposition of property concerned for any purpose;

(c)  the party, witness, or any other person claims to be entitled, as against the judgment creditor or a receiver appointed or to be appointed in the proceedings, to hold property derived from or through the judgment debtor or to be discharged from the payment of a debt which was due to the judgment debtor or to a person in the debtor's behalf.

(2)  An answer cannot be used as evidence against the person so answering in a criminal action or proceeding, except in an action for perjury against the person for falsely testifying.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

